Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 2. Killing Unlicensed Dogs

§ 3621.
Issuance of warrant to impound; complaint.

The legislative body of a municipality may at any time issue a warrant to one or more police officers, constables, pound keepers, or appointed animal control officers, directing them to promptly impound all dogs or wolf-hybrids within the town or city not licensed according to the provisions of this subchapter, except as exempted by section 3587 of this title, and to enter a complaint against the owners or keepers of the impounded dogs and wolf-hybrids.
(a) (1) The legislative body of a municipality may at any time issue a warrant to one or more police officers, constables, pound keepers, or appointed animal control officers, directing them to promptly impound all dogs or wolf-hybrids within the town or city not licensed according to the provisions of this subchapter, except as exempted by section 3587 of this title, and to enter a complaint against the owners or keepers of the impounded dogs and wolf-hybrids.

A dog or wolf-hybrid impounded by a municipality under this section may be transferred to an animal shelter or rescue organization for the purpose of finding an adoptive home for the dog or wolf-hybrid. If the dog or wolf-hybrid cannot be placed in an adoptive home or transferred to a humane society or rescue organization within ten days, or a greater number of days established by the municipality, the dog or wolf-hybrid may be destroyed in a humane way. The municipality shall not be liable for expenses associated with keeping the dog or wolf-hybrid at the animal shelter or rescue organization beyond the established number of days.

A municipality may waive the license fee for a dog or wolf-hybrid impounded pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for the current year upon a showing of current vaccinations and financial hardship. In the event of waiver due to financial hardship, the State shall not receive its portion of a dog license fee.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb 28, 1980;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. April 1, 1995;

2009, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2021, No. 20

, § 202.

§ 3622.
Form of warrant.

Such warrant shall be in the following form:

State of Vermont:
)
) County, ss.
) To , constable or police officer of the town or city of : PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>By the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded to impound all dogs and wolf-hybrids not duly licensed according to law without delay, except as exempted by ; and you are further required to make and return complaint against the owner or keeper of any such dog or wolf-hybrid. A dog or wolf-hybrid that is impounded may be transferred to an animal shelter or rescue organization for the purpose of finding an adoptive home for the dog or wolf-hybrid. If the dog or wolf-hybrid cannot be placed in an adoptive home or transferred to a humane society or rescue organization within ten days, or a greater number of days established by the municipality, the dog or wolf-hybrid may be destroyed in a humane way.

20 V.S.A. § 3587

PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>Hereof fail not, and due return make of this warrant, with your doings thereon, within 90 days from the date hereof, stating the number of dogs or wolf-hybrids destroyed and the names of the owners or keepers thereof, and whether all unlicensed dogs or wolf-hybrids in such town (or city) have been destroyed, and the names of persons against whom complaints have been made under the provisions of 20 V.S.A. chapter 193, subchapters 1, 2, and 4, and whether complaints have been made and returned against all persons who have failed to comply with the provisions of such subchapter. Given under our (my) hands at day of , 20 .
Legislative Body

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 11 eff. April 12, 1978;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. April 1, 1995;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2021, No. 20

, § 203.

§ 3623.
Constable to make complaints.

A constable to whom a warrant has been issued pursuant to section 3621 of this subchapter shall make complaints required by the warrant to the designee of the legislative body of the municipality.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2021, No. 20

, § 204.

§ 3624.
Who may destroy; fees.

A police officer or constable shall humanely destroy or cause to be destroyed dogs or wolf-hybrids whenever a warrant has been issued authorizing such actions, except as exempted by section 3587 of this title. Any action must be taken within 90 days of the issuance of the warrant. The officer shall incinerate, bury, or cause to be buried or otherwise properly dispose of their remains.

Any officers, other than those employed under regular pay, shall receive compensation for each dog or wolf-hybrid so destroyed as authorized by the legislative body of their respective towns. Bills for any services shall be approved by the legislative body of the municipality in which the dogs or wolf-hybrids are destroyed, and paid from monies received under the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended 1977, No 215 (Adj. Sess.), § 12 eff. April 12, 1978;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. April 1, 1995.

§ 3625.
Return by officers.

Each police officer or constable to whom a warrant is issued pursuant to section 3621 of this subchapter shall make the return directed by the warrant to the authority issuing the warrant within 90 days from its date.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. April 12, 1978;

2021, No. 20

, § 205.

§ 3626.
Certificate to State’s Attorney.

The selectboard or mayor shall annually, within ten days from July 25, transmit a certificate, subscribed and sworn to, of the fact of the issue of such warrant, and whether the same has been duly executed and returned agreeably to the provisions of this chapter, to the State’s Attorneys of their respective counties, who shall prosecute town officers who fail to comply with the provisions of this subchapter.

§ 3627.
Repealed. 1993, No. 213 (Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. June 15, 1994.